Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-8202
Purposes of act.

The purposes of the Captive Insurers Act are to set forth the procedures for organizing and regulating the operations of captive insurers within the State of Nebraska and to encourage integrity, financial solvency, and stability of captive insurers for the purpose of promoting the development of Nebraska businesses.

Laws 2007, LB117, § 36.